Utah statutes.
58-17b-621.   Automated pharmacy systems.

Automated pharmacy systems can be utilized in licensed pharmacies, remote locations under the jurisdiction of the Utah State Board of Pharmacy, and licensed health care facilities where legally permissible, as approved by the division in collaboration with the board, and described in rule.

